Wyoming, session 2025, HB0241.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-1-121 is created to read:

33-1-121. Health care providers; telehealth services;
definitions.

(a) A health care provider, as defined in W.S.
26-55-102(a)(xii), with a valid, unencumbered license and
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
who is in good standing to practice in any other state,
United States territory or the District of Columbia shall
be permitted to conduct telehealth services with persons
who are physically present in Wyoming when telehealth
services are rendered without first obtaining a license
under this title. In addition:

(i) The health care provider who is not licensed
in Wyoming shall be physically present outside Wyoming in
order to conduct telehealth services under this section;

(ii) The appropriate licensing board shall be
notified before the health care provider begins providing
telehealth services under this section unless a patient has
an established relationship with the health care provider;

(iii) As used in this section, "telehealth"
means the practice of medicine by electronic communication
or other means from a health care provider in one (1)
location to a patient in another location.

Section 2. W.S. 33-9-103, 33-10-105(a), 33-15-108(a)
and (h), 33-15-114(a) by creating a new paragraph (xiii),
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
33-21-120(a)(i)(D), 33-21-145(a)(i), 33-21-151(a)(i) and
(iii), 33-23-101(a)(iv), 33-23-103(a), 33-25-101(a)(i),
(ii) and (vi), 33-25-102(a)(intro) and (f) by creating a
new paragraph (viii), 33-25-116(a)(i) and (iii),
33-26-301(a), 33-26-410(a), 33-26-504(a), 33-27-113(a)(xi)
and (xii), 33-27-114 by creating a new subsection (j),
33-27-119(b), 33-33-103(b), 33-33-202(b), 33-38-102(a)(x)
through (xii) and (xvi), 33-38-103 by creating a new
subsection (g), 33-40-102(a)(ii) and (iv), 33-40-103(a),
33-40-115(b) and (d)(ii), 33-46-105(a), 33-49-102(a)(iii),
33-49-106(a)(x) and 33-49-107(a)(intro) and (e) are amended
to read:

33-9-103. License required to practice.

It is unlawful for a person to profess to be a podiatrist,
to practice or assume the duties incident to podiatry or to
advertise in any form or hold himself out to the public as
a podiatrist, or in a sign or advertisement to use the word
"podiatrist", "foot correctionist", "foot expert", "foot
specialist", "chiropodist" or any other term or designation
indicating to the public that he is holding himself out as
a podiatrist or foot correctionist in any manner, without
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
first obtaining from the board a license authorizing the
practice of podiatry in this state under this act or as
provided by W.S. 33-1-121.

33-10-105. License required.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to practice
chiropractic in this state without first obtaining a
license, as provided for in this act, or as provided by
W.S. 33-1-121.

33-15-108. Licensing; qualifications; examinations;
fees.

(a) Except as provided by W.S. 33-1-121, any person
who has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse
to the practice of dentistry or to the ability to practice
dentistry, who has graduated and attained the degree of
doctor of dental surgery or doctor of dental medicine from
a college or university in the United States or Canada
accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the
American Dental Association, may apply to the board to have
the applicant's qualifications considered for licensure to
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
practice dentistry. The applicant shall pass a written,
clinical and state examination that follows national
standards as determined by rule of the board.

(h) The board may make and prescribe rules and
regulations for the licensure and practice of dentistry in
the state of Wyoming, including rules and regulations
pertaining to telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121, not
inconsistent with this act. For purposes of this
subsection, "practice of dentistry" includes the work of
dental hygienists, dental auxiliaries, dental technicians
and dental laboratories.

33-15-114. Persons deemed to be practicing dentistry;
work authorizations from licensed dentist.

(a) Except as provided by paragraph (xii) of this
subsection, any person is deemed to be practicing dentistry
within the meaning of this act:

(xiii) Who provides telehealth services under
W.S. 33-1-121.

HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
33-21-120. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Advanced practice registered nurse (APRN)"
means a nurse who:

(D) Has completed an advanced program of
study in a specialty area in an accredited nursing program,
has taken and passed a national certification examination
in the same area and has been granted licensure by the
board to practice as an APRN or is providing telehealth
services under W.S. 33-1-121.

33-21-145. Violations; penalties.

(a) No person shall:

(i) Engage in the practice of nursing or nurse
assisting as defined in this act without a valid, current
license, certificate or temporary permit, except as
otherwise permitted under this act, under W.S. 33-1-121 or
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
the Nurse Licensure Compact or the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Compact;

33-21-151. Injunctive relief; grounds.

(a) The board may petition in its own name for an
injunction to a proper court of competent jurisdiction to
enjoin:

(i) Any person from practicing nursing or nurse
assisting, within the meaning of this act or under W.S.
33-1-121, without a valid license, certificate or temporary
permit, unless so exempted under W.S. 33-21-154;

(iii) Any person, firm, corporation, institution
or association from employing any individual to practice
nursing or nurse assisting who is not licensed or certified
under this act, providing telehealth services under W.S.
33-1-121 or exempted under W.S. 33-21-154.

33-23-101. Definitions; authorized scope of practice;
prohibited procedures; exceptions.

HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
(a) As used in this act:

(iv) "Optometrist" or "doctor of optometry"
means a person licensed by the board under this act or
providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121;

33-23-103. License required; civil suit; damages.

(a) It is unlawful for any person in the state of
Wyoming to practice or attempt to practice optometry or to
advertise, or hold himself out as qualified to fit or
adjust any lenses or lens in any manner or form as an aid
to human eyesight, without first obtaining a license to
practice optometry or providing telehealth services under
W.S. 33-1-121.

33-25-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Physical therapy" or "physiotherapy" means
the care and services provided by or under the direction
and supervision of a physical therapist or physiotherapist
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
who is licensed pursuant to this act or providing
telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121. The practice of
physical therapy includes:

(ii) "Physical therapist" or "physiotherapist"
means a person who is licensed to practice physical therapy
pursuant to this act or is providing telehealth services
under W.S. 33-1-121;

(vi) "Physical therapy services" means the care
and services provided by a licensed physical therapist or a
certified physical therapist assistant pursuant to this act
or providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121;

33-25-102. Practice of physical therapy; license or
certificate required; exceptions; false representations.

(a) No individual shall engage in the practice of
physical therapy services nor hold himself out as being
able to practice physical therapy in the state of Wyoming
unless he is practicing under W.S. 33-1-121 or is licensed
or certified in accordance with the provisions of this act
and such license or certificate is in good standing and has
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
not been suspended or revoked, except nothing in this act
shall:

(f) The following persons are exempt from the
licensure and certification requirements of this act:

(viii) Persons practicing under W.S. 33-1-121.

33-25-116. Injunctive relief; grounds.

(a) The board may petition in its own name for an
injunction to an appropriate court to enjoin:

(i) Any person violating W.S. 33-25-102(a),
unless specifically exempt from licensure or certification
pursuant to W.S. 33-25-102(f) or providing telehealth
services under W.S. 33-1-121;

(iii) Any person, firm, corporation,
institution, association, business or other entity from
employing any individual to practice physical therapy who
is not licensed or certified as required by this act or
providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121.
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391

33-26-301. License required.

(a) No person shall practice medicine in this state
without a license granted by the board, as provided by W.S.
33-1-121 or as otherwise provided by law.

33-26-410. Effect of violation.

(a) Any person engaged in the practice of medicine or
aiding and abetting another in the practice of medicine
without a license granted by the board or providing
telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121 is guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine
of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1)
year, or both. Each violation constitutes a separate
offense for which the penalty in this subsection may be
assessed.

33-26-504. License required; application;
qualifications; consideration of applications; exception
for telehealth services.
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391

(a) Except as provided by W.S. 33-1-121, no person
shall practice as a physician assistant or represent
oneself as a physician assistant without a license granted
by the board.

33-27-113. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xi) "Licensed assistant behavior analyst" means
a person licensed under this act for the practice of
behavior analysis and who is supervised in accordance with
W.S. 33-27-124(c) or who is providing telehealth services
under W.S. 33-1-121;

(xii) "Licensed behavior analyst" means a person
licensed under this act for the practice of behavior
analysis or who is providing telehealth services under W.S.
33-1-121;

33-27-114. Exemptions.

HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
(j) Nothing in this act shall prevent a person from
practicing psychology or behavior analysis under W.S.
33-1-121.

33-27-119. Practice without license.

(b) Unless exempt under W.S. 33-1-121, 33-27-114 or
33-27-125, any person who represents himself as a
psychologist and who engages in the practice of psychology
or represents himself as a behavior analyst or assistant
behavior analyst and who engages in the practice of
behavior analysis in violation of this act, is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven
hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more
than six (6) months, or both. Each violation shall
constitute a separate offense.

33-33-103. Persons and practices affected.

(b) No person shall practice or represent himself as
a speech-language pathologist or audiologist unless
licensed pursuant to this act or providing telehealth
services pursuant to W.S. 33-1-121.
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391

33-33-202. Functions of the board.

(b) The board shall adopt rules and regulations to
implement and enforce the provisions of this act and W.S.
33-1-121.

33-38-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(x) Certified addictions practitioner (CAP)
means a person certified under this act to practice
addictions treatment, prevention, intervention, diagnosis,
referral and follow up under the supervision of a qualified
clinical supervisor licensed in the state of Wyoming or
providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121;

(xi) Certified social worker (CSW) means a
person certified under this act to perform social work
treatment, prevention, intervention, case management,
referral and follow up with individuals diagnosed with
mental illnesses or mental disorders under the supervision
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of
Wyoming or a person providing telehealth services under
W.S. 33-1-121;

(xii) Certified mental health worker (CMHW)
means a person certified under this act to perform the
application of human services or psychological theory and
methods to the assessment, treatment or prevention of
psychosocial dysfunction, disability or impairment,
including emotional or mental disorders, under the
supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in
the state of Wyoming or a person providing telehealth
services under W.S. 33-1-121. The practice of a CMHW shall
not include assigning a diagnosis or acting as a primary
treatment provider;

(xvi) "Certified addictions practitioner
assistant" means a person certified under this act to
assist in the practice of addictions treatment, prevention,
intervention, referral and followup under the supervision
of a qualified clinical supervisor licensed in the state of
Wyoming or a person providing telehealth services under
W.S. 33-1-121;
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391

33-38-103. Exemptions.

(g) Nothing in this act shall prevent a person from
providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121.

33-40-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(ii) "Occupational therapy assistant" or "OTA"
means a person licensed under this act to assist in the
practice of occupational therapy and who works under the
supervision of an occupational therapist to perform tasks
requiring occupational therapy professional knowledge or
judgment or a person providing telehealth services under
W.S. 33-1-121;

(iv) "Occupational therapist" means a person
licensed to practice occupational therapy under this act or
a person providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121;

33-40-103. License required.
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391

(a) No person shall hold himself out as an
occupational therapist, an occupational therapy assistant
or as being able to practice occupational therapy in
Wyoming unless he is licensed under this act, providing
telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121 or is otherwise
authorized under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact
under W.S. 33-40-202 through 33-40-216. An unlicensed
person holding himself out as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapist assistant by using additional or
modifying words in his title, printed materials,
advertisements or otherwise shall be deemed to be holding
himself out as an occupational therapist or occupational
therapist assistant.

33-40-115. Board of occupational therapy practice;
powers and duties.

(b) The board shall establish rules and regulations
according to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to
carry out the purpose of this act and W.S. 33-1-121,
including establishing rules for professional conduct, for
professional licensure and to establish ethical standards
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
of practice for persons licensed to practice occupational
therapy in Wyoming.

(d) The board may, with the approval and assistance
of the attorney general, petition the district court in the
name of the state of Wyoming to enjoin:

(ii) Any person or other entity from advertising
or claiming to provide occupational therapy services in
this state when the services are not or will not be
provided by a person licensed under this act, providing
telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121 or is otherwise
authorized under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact
under W.S. 33-40-202 through 33-40-216.

33-46-105. Prohibited acts and exceptions.

(a) Unless licensed pursuant to this act or
practicing under W.S. 33-1-121, no person shall practice
midwifery or hold himself out to be a midwife, a licensed
midwife or a certified professional midwife except that a
certified nurse midwife may hold himself out to be a
midwife.
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391

33-49-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(iii) "Acupuncturist" means any person to whom a
license to practice acupuncture in this state has been
issued under this chapter or who is providing telehealth
services under W.S. 33-1-121;

33-49-106. Board responsibilities and duties.

(a) The board shall:

(x) Promulgate rules and regulations as
necessary to carry out this chapter or W.S. 33-1-121.

33-49-107. Licensure required; components;
exemptions; other licensed health care professionals.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2018, unless the person is
licensed to practice acupuncture in compliance with this
chapter, is providing telehealth services under W.S.
HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
33-1-121 and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto, no person shall:

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
prohibit or restrict any other licensed health care
provider in this state from practicing acupuncture within
their statutory scope of practice. However, no person may
represent themselves as an acupuncturist in any manner
unless licensed in accordance with this chapter or
providing telehealth services under W.S. 33-1-121.

Section 3. The state board of nursing, the state
board of medicine, the state board of psychology, the state
board of registration in podiatry, the board of
chiropractic examiners, the board of physical therapy, the
mental health professionals licensing board, the board of
examiners for speech-language pathology and audiology, the
board of dental examiners, the board of examiners of
optometry, the board of occupational therapy, the board of
acupuncture and the board of midwifery shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0241

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0391
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0241